Utah statutes.
41-6a-1630.   Standards applicable to vehicles.

(1)  The following standards apply to vehicles under Sections 41-6a-1629 through 41-6a-1633:

(a) A replacement part and equipment used in a mechanical alteration shall be:

(i)  designed and capable of performing the function for which they are intended; and 

(ii)  equal to or greater in strength and durability than the original parts provided by the original manufacturer.

(b)  Except for original equipment, a person may not use spacers to increase wheel track width of a vehicle.

(c) A person may not use axle blocks to alter the suspension on the front axle of a vehicle.

(d) A person may not stack two or more axle blocks of a vehicle.

(2) (a)  In doubtful or unusual cases, or to meet specific industrial requirements, personnel of the Utah Highway Patrol shall inspect the vehicle to determine:

(i)  the road worthiness and safe condition of the vehicle; and

(ii)  whether it complies with Sections 41-6a-1629 through 41-6a-1633.

(b)  If the vehicle complies, the Utah Highway Patrol shall issue a permit of approval that shall be carried in the vehicle.

(3) (a)  Upon notice to the party to whom the motor vehicle is registered, the department shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle equipped, altered, or modified in violation of Sections 41-6a-1629 through 41-6a-1633.

(b)  The Motor Vehicle Division shall, under Subsection 41-1a-109(1)(e) or (2), refuse to register any motor vehicle it has reason to believe is equipped, altered, or modified in violation of Sections 41-6a-1629 through 41-6a-1633.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

